Nevada, session 83, AB111.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484B.227 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484B.227 1. Every vehicle driven upon a divided highway
must be driven only upon the right-hand roadway and must not be
driven over, across or within any dividing space, barrier or section
or make any left turn, semicircular turn or U-turn, except through an
opening in the barrier or dividing section or space or at a crossover
or intersection established by a public authority.
2. A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
3. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)